Washington statutes.
RCW 3.02.060

Judge pro tempore appointments.

A judge pro tempore may be authorized under RCW 3.50.090 or 35.20.200 whenever a judge of the municipal court serves on a judicial commission, board, or committee established by the legislature or the chief justice of the supreme court. The judge pro tempore shall be compensated as specified in RCW 3.50.090 or 35.20.200.

[ 2000 c 165 s 2.]